Utah statutes.
13-11a-1.   Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to prevent deceptive, misleading, and false advertising practices and forms in Utah.  This chapter is to be construed to accomplish that purpose and not to prohibit any particular form of advertising so long as it is truthful and not otherwise misleading or deceptive.



Enacted by Chapter 205, 1989 General Session

